Hawaii statutes.
§182-13 Surrender of mining leases.
Any lessee of a mining lease, who has complied fully with all the terms,
covenants, and conditions of the existing lease, may, with the consent of the
board, surrender at any time and from time to time all or any part of a mining
lease or the land contained therein upon payments as consideration therefor two
years' rent prorated upon the portion of the lease or land surrendered. The
lessee shall thereupon be relieved of any further liability or duty with
respect to the land or lease so surrendered; provided that nothing herein
contained shall constitute a waiver of any liability or duty the lessee may
have with respect to the land or lease surrendered as a result of any previous
activities conducted on the land or under the lease. Upon the termination,
cancellation, or surrender of any mining lease or any portion thereof, the
lessee shall have the right to remove any and all equipment, buildings, and
plants placed on the land surrendered by the holder of the mining lease. A
mining lease may also be surrendered if as a result of a final determination by
a court of competent jurisdiction, the lessee is found to have acquired no
rights in or to the minerals on reserved lands, nor the right to exploit the
same, pursuant to the lease, and, in such event, the lessee shall be reimbursed
for rentals paid to the State pursuant to the lease. [L 1963, c 11, pt of §1;
Supp, §99A-13; HRS §182-13; am L 2016, c 220, §10]

Note

The amendment made by L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in
this section.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next